Idaho, session 2026, S1294.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 9, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-905A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-905A. HEARING LOSS SCREENING. (1) In addition to other tests re-
quired by this chapter, all infants and newborns shall be screened for
hearing loss prior to discharge from a hospital, health care facility, or
birthing facility. For births occurring outside of a hospital, health care
facility, or birthing facility, the birthing attendant shall ensure that the
infant or newborn is screened for hearing loss or is referred to a hearing
screening facility to be screened for hearing loss no later than twenty-one
(21) days from the date of birth.
(2) The hearing loss screening required by this section shall employ
physiologic screening methods approved by the Idaho educational services
for the deaf and the blind (IESDB), including otoacoustic emissions or au-
tomated auditory brainstem response.
(3) The screening facility or provider shall report the results of all
failed hearing screenings to the IESDB within seven (7) days and all other
results monthly to ensure appropriate follow-up and early intervention.
(4) All tests and screenings required by this section shall be per-
formed in accordance with standards, schedules, and protocols established
or approved by the IESDB. The IESDB may provide guidance or educational mate-
rials to assist providers in carrying out the requirements of this section.
(5) The provisions of this section are contingent on continued receipt
of federal funding intended to support infant and newborn hearing screening
and shall not be enforceable if the loss of such federal funding would result
in an increased cost to the state.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.